Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.320

Application for a permit to site an energy plant or alternative energy resource—Written notice to United States department of defense.

(1) Upon receipt of an application for a permit to site an energy plant or alternative energy resource that is connected to electrical transmission facilities of a nominal voltage of at least one hundred fifteen thousand volts, the county shall notify in writing the United States department of defense. The notification shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) A description of the proposed energy plant or alternative energy resource;

(b) The location of the site;

(c) The number and placement of the energy plant or alternative energy resource on the site;

(d) The date and time by which comments must be received by the county; and

(e) Contact information of the county permitting authority and the applicant.

(2) The purpose of the written notification is to provide an opportunity for the United States department of defense to comment upon the application, and to identify potential issues relating to the placement and operations of the energy plant or alternative energy resource, before a permit application is approved. The time period set forth by the county for receipt of such comments shall not extend the time period for the county's processing of the application.

(3) For the purpose of this section, "alternative energy resource," "energy plant," and "electrical transmission facility" shall each have the meaning set forth in RCW 80.50.020.

[ 2011 c 261 s 2.]